src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/adj-3_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each adjective:
# ok = checked against 
# ? = not checked
# c = Comp or Superl attested in corpus

# Contracted adjectives. SÁDNES; GOAVSOS

Tests:

  Adjective - sáltes: # SÁDNES and TJIEGOS
    sáltes+A+Attr: sáltes
    sáltes+A+Sg+Nom: sáltes
    sáltes+A+Sg+Ine: [sálltán, sálltásin]
    sáltes+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [sálltáp, sálltásabbo]
    sáltes+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [sálltámus, sálltásamos]
    sáltes+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [sálltábut, sálltásappot]
    sáltes+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [sálltámusát, sálltásabmusit]
    sáltes+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: [sálltábusj, sálltásappusj]
    sáltes+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [sálltábuttjat, sálltásapputjit]
    sáltes+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [sálltát, sálltásit]
    sáltes+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: sáltesvuohta

  Adjective - sádnes: # SÁDNES
    sádnes+A+Attr: sádnes
    sádnes+A+Sg+Nom: sádnes
    sádnes+A+Sg+Ine: sáddnán
    sádnes+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: sáddnáp
    sádnes+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: sáddnámus
    sádnes+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: sáddnábut
    sádnes+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: sáddnámusát
    sádnes+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: sáddnábusj
    sádnes+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: sáddnábuttjat
    sádnes+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: sáddnát
    sádnes+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: sádnesvuohta

  Adjective - goasvos: # GOAVSOS and TJIEGOS
    goavsos+A+Attr: goavsos
    goavsos+A+Sg+Nom: goavsos
    goavsos+A+Sg+Gen: [goaksu,goaksusa]
    goavsos+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [goaksup,goaksusabbo]
    goavsos+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [goaksumus,goaksusamos]
    goavsos+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [goaksubut, goaksusappot]
    goavsos+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [goaksumusát, goaksusabmusit]
    goavsos+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: [goaksubusj, goaksusappusj]
    goavsos+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [goaksubuttjat, goaksusapputjit]
    goavsos+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [goaksut,goaksusit]
    goavsos+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: goavsosvuohta
